tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Fitness ve Genel Egzersiz Ekipmanları > Egzersiz Ekipmanı Matları: Eliptik Eğitmen Matları; Egzersiz Bisikleti Paspasları; Zemin Koruma Paspasları; Kürek Makinası Paspasları; Merdiven Tırmanıcı ve Step Paspasları
nl: Sportartikelen > Fitness- en algemene trainingsapparaten > Matten voor fitnessapparatuur: Matten voor crosstrainers; Vloermatten voor hometrainers; Beschermmatten voor vloeren; Matten voor roei-apparaten; Matten voor trapklimmers en -steppers
nb: Sportsutstyr > Utstyr for fitness- og generell trening > Matter for treningsutstyr: Matter til ellipsemaskiner; Matter til ergometersykler; Matter for gulvbeskyttelse; Matter til romaskiner; Matter til trappe- og stepmaskiner
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > อุปกรณ์ออกกำลังกายทั่วไปและฟิตเนส > ที่รองอุปกรณ์ออกกำลังกาย: เสื่อสำหรับเครื่องอิลิปทิคอล; เสื่อปูพื้นสำหรับจักรยานออกกำลังกาย; เสื่อป้องกันพื้น; เสื่อปูเครื่องจำลองท่าพายเรือ; เสื่อรองเครื่องปีนบันไดและสเตปเปอร์
ru: Спортивные товары > Фитнес и физические упражнения > Коврики под тренажеры: Коврики под эллиптические тренажеры; Коврики под велотренажеры; Коврики для защиты пола; Коврики под гребные тренажеры; Коврики под для тренажеры-лестницы и степперы
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Echipamente pentru fitness și exerciții fizice > Covorașe pentru echipamente de fitness: Covorașe pentru biciclete eliptice; Covorașe pentru biciclete statice; Covorașe de protecție pentru pardoseală; Covorașe pentru aparate de vâslit; Covorale pentru scări rulante și steppere
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Εξοπλισμός για γενική άσκηση & φυσική κατάσταση > Στρώματα εξοπλισμού γυμναστικής: Στρώματα για ελλειπτικά μηχανήματα; Χαλάκια προστασίας δαπέδου για στατικά ποδήλατα γυμναστικής; Στρώματα προστασίας δαπέδου; Χαλάκια κωπηλατικών μηχανημάτων; Στρώματα για αναρριχητήρα με σκάλες & βηματιστήρα
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Kuntoilu- ja yleiskuntolaitteet > Kuntosalimatot: Crosstrainerin matot; Kuntopyörän matot; Lattian suojamatot; Soutulaitteen matot; Porraslaitteiden ja stepperien matot
da: Sportsartikler > Fitness og almindeligt træningsudstyr > Måtter til træningsmaskiner: Måtter til crosstrænere; Måtter til motionscykler; Måtter til gulvbeskyttelse; Måtter til romaskiner; Måtter til trappe- og stepmaskiner
hu: Sportszerek > Fitnesz és általános edzőfelszerelés > Edzőfelszerelés-szőnyegek: Elliptikustréner-szőnyegek; Edzőkerékpár-padlószőnyegek; Padlóvédő szőnyegek; Evezőgépszőnyegek; Lépcsőzőgép- és taposógép-szőnyegek
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipos de fitness y ejercicio general > Esteras para equipos de gimnasia: Alfombrillas para bicicleta elíptica; Alfombrillas para bicicletas estáticas; Colchonetas de protección del suelo; Colchonetas para máquinas de remo; Colchonetas para stepper y máquina de subir escalones
fr: Équipements sportifs > Équipement de fitness et d’exercice général > Tapis pour machines d’exercice: Tapis de vélo elliptique; Tapis de sol pour vélo d’appartement; Tapis de protection de sol; Tapis de rameur; Tapis pour simulateurs d’escaliers et steppers
it: Articoli sportivi > Attrezzature per fitness e esercizi generali > Tappetini attrezzi esercizi: Tappetini per allenamento ellittico; Tappetini per cyclette; Tappetini di protezione del pavimento; Tappetini per vogatore; Tappetini per scale e stepper
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 健身及一般運動器材 > 運動器材墊: 橢圓機護墊; 健身車腳墊; 地板保護墊; 划船機保護墊; 登山機/踏步機保護墊
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Thiết bị tập thể thao & thể dục tổng hợp > Thảm tập thể dục: Thảm tập đạp xe; Thảm sàn xe đạp tập thể dục; Thảm bảo vệ sàn; Thảm máy tập chèo thuyền; Thảm máy tập leo cầu thang
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Оборудване за фитнес и общи упражнения > Подложки за фитнес уреди: Подложки за елиптичен тренажор; Подложки за велоергометър; Защитни подложки за под; Подложки за гребни тренажори; Подложки за уреди за изкачване на стълби и степери
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Vybavenie na fitness a cvičenie > Podložky na cvičenie: Podložky pre eliptické trenažéry; Podložky pod rotopedy; Ochranné podložky; Podložky pod veslovací trenažér; Podložky pre nekonečné schody a stepery
ko: 스포츠용품 > 피트니스/일반 운동 장비 > 운동 장비 매트: 일립티컬 트레이너 매트; 실내 운동용 자전거 바닥 매트; 바닥 보호용 매트; 로잉 머신 매트; 스테어 클라이머/스테퍼 매트
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 健身与一般运动器材 > 运动器材专用垫: 椭圆机垫; 健身车地垫; 地板保护垫; 划船机垫; 爬楼梯机/踏步机垫
sv: Sportartiklar > Fitness- och allmän träningsutrustning > Mattor för träningsutrustning: Mattor för ellipstränare; Golvmattor för träningscykel; Skyddsmattor för golv; Mattor för roddmaskiner; Mattor för trappmaskiner
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Equipamentos para fitness e exercícios gerais > Tapetes para equipamento de exercício: Tapetes para bicicletas elípticas; Tapetes para bicicletas de exercício; Tapetes de proteção do pavimento; Tapetes para máquinas de remo; Tapetes para máquina de escadas e stepper
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Oprema za fitnes in splošno vadbo > Podloge za vadbeno opremo: Podloge za eliptične trenažerje; Talne podloge za sobna kolesa; Zaščitne podlage za tla; Podloge za veslače; Podloge za fitnes stopnice in steperje
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sprzęt fitness i ogólny do ćwiczeń > Maty pod sprzęt do ćwiczeń: Maty do orbitreków; Maty podłogowe do rowerów treningowych; Maty ochronne na podłogę; Maty do trenażerów wioślarskich; Maty do schodołazów i stepperów
en: Sporting Goods > Fitness & General Exercise Equipment > Exercise Equipment Mats: Elliptical Trainer Mats; Exercise Bike Floor Mats; Floor Protection Mats; Rowing Machine Mats; Stair Climber & Stepper Mats
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Vybavení pro fitness a běžné cvičení > Podložky pod cvičební stroje: Podložky pro eliptické trenažéry; Podložky pod rotopedy; Podložky na ochranu podlah; Podložky pro veslovací trenažéry; Podložky pod steppery
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Fitneso ir bendrojo pobūdžio treniruočių įranga > Treniruočių įrangos kilimėliai: Elipsinių treniruoklių kilimėliai; Dviračių treniruoklių kilimėliai; Apsauginiai grindų kilimėliai; Irklavimo treniruoklių kilimėliai; Laiptų ir žingsniavimo treniruoklių kilimėliai
ja: スポーツ用品 > フィットネス・一般的な運動器具 > 運動器具用フロアマット: エリプティカルマシン用マット; エアロバイク用フロアマット; フロアプロテクションマット; ローイングマシン用マット; ステアクライマー・ステッパー用マット
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Equipamentos de fitness e exercícios gerais > Colchonetes para equipamentos de ginástica: Tapetes de treino elíptico; Tapetes para bicicletas ergométricas; Tapetes de proteção de piso; Tapetes para máquinas de remo; Tapetes para simuladores de escada
de: Sportartikel > Fitness- & allgemeine Trainingsgeräte > Matten für Heimtrainer: Matten für Crosstrainer; Fußmatten für Heimtrainer; Bodenschutzmatten; Matten für Rudergeräte; Matten für Treppensteiger und Stepper
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Oprema za fitness i tjelovježbu > Prostirke za opremu za vježbanje: Prostirke za eliptične trenažere; Prostirke za sobne bicikle; Zaštitne prostirke za pod; Prostirke za sprave za veslanje; Prostirke za stepere i simulatore za penjanje